Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 238.005 is amended to read:
238.005. For purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Active member” means a member who is presently employed by a participating public em-
ployer in a qualifying position and who has completed the  six-month period of service required by
ORS 238.015.
(2) “Annuity” means payments for life derived  from contributions made by a member as provided
in this chapter.
(3) “Board” means the Public Employees Retirement Board.
(4) “Calendar year” means  12 calendar months commencing on January 1 and ending on De-
cember 31 following.
(5) “Continuous service” means service not interrupted for more than five years,  except that
such continuous service shall be computed without regard to interruptions in the case of:
(a) An employee who had returned to the service  of the employer as of January 1, 1945, and
who remained in that employment until having  established membership in the Public Employees
Retirement System.
(b) An employee who was  in the armed services on January 1, 1945, and returned to the service
of the employer  within one year of the date of being otherwise than dishonorably discharged and
remained in that employment until having established membership in the  Public Employees Retire-
ment System.
(6) “Creditable service” means any period of time during which an active member is being paid
a salary by a participating public employer and  for which benefits under this chapter are funded by
employer contributions and earnings on the fund. For purposes of computing  years of “creditable
service,” full months and major fractions of a month shall be considered  to be one-twelfth of a year
and shall be added to all full years. “Creditable service” includes all retirement  credit received by
a member.
(7) “Earliest service retirement age” means the age attained by a member when  the member
could first make application for retirement under the provisions of ORS 238.280.
(8) “Employee” includes, in addition to employees, public officers, but does not include:
(a) Persons engaged as independent contractors.
Enrolled House Bill 2875 (HB 2875-A) Page 1
(b) Seasonal, emergency or casual workers whose periods of employment with  any public em-
ployer or public employers do not total 600 hours in any calendar year.
(c) Persons provided  sheltered employment or made-work by a public employer in an employment
or industries program maintained for the benefit of such persons.
(d) Persons employed and  paid from federal funds received under a federal program intended
primarily to alleviate unemployment.  However, any such person shall be considered an “employee”
if not otherwise excluded  by paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection and the public employer elects
to have the person so considered by an irrevocable written notice to the board.
(e) Persons who are employees of a railroad, as defined in ORS  824.020, and who, as such em-
ployees, are included in a retirement plan  under federal railroad retirement statutes. This paragraph
shall be deemed to have been in effect since the inception of the system.
(f) Persons employed in positions classified as post-doctoral scholar  positions by a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002, or by the Oregon Health and Science University, under ORS 350.370.
(9) “Final average salary” means whichever of the following is greater:
(a) The average salary per calendar year paid by one  or more participating public employers to
an employee who is an active member of the system in three of the calendar  years of membership
before the effective date of retirement of the  employee, in which three years the employee was paid
the highest salary. The three calendar years in which  the employee was paid the largest total salary
may include calendar years in which the employee was employed for less than a full  calendar year.
If the number of calendar  years of active membership before the effective date of retirement of the
employee  is  three or fewer, the final average salary for the employee is the average salary per
calendar year paid  by one or more participating public employers to the employee in all of those
years, without regard to whether the employee was employed for the full calendar year.
(b) One-third of the total salary paid by a participating  public employer to an employee who is
an active member of the system in  the last 36 calendar months of active membership before the ef-
fective date of retirement of the employee.
(10) “Firefighter” does not include a volunteer firefighter, but does include:
(a) The State Fire Marshal, the chief deputy fire marshal and deputy state fire marshals;
(b) An employee of the State  Fire Marshal whose primary duties include fire investi-
gation, fire prevention, fire safety, fire control or fire suppression;
[(b)] (c) An employee of the State Forestry Department who is  certified by the State Forester
as a professional wildland firefighter and whose primary duties include the abatement of  uncon-
trolled fires as described in ORS 477.064; and
[(c)] (d) An employee of the Oregon Military Department whose primary duties include fighting
structural, aircraft, wildland or other fires.
(11) “Fiscal year” means 12 calendar months commencing on July 1 and  ending on June 30 fol-
lowing.
(12) “Fund” means the Public Employees Retirement Fund.
(13) “Inactive member” means a member who is not  employed in a qualifying position, whose
membership has not been terminated in the manner described by  ORS 238.095 and who is not retired
for service or disability.
(14) “Institution of higher education” means a public university listed  in ORS 352.002, the
Oregon Health and Science University and a community college, as defined in ORS 341.005.
(15) “Member” means a person  who has established membership in the system and whose mem-
bership has not been terminated as described in ORS  238.095. “Member” includes active, inactive
and retired members.
(16) “Member account” means the regular account and the variable account.
(17) “Normal retirement age” means:
(a) For a person who establishes  membership in the system before January 1, 1996, as described
in ORS 238.430,  55 years of age if the employee retires at that age as a police officer or firefighter
or 58 years of age if the employee retires at that age as other than a police officer or firefighter.
Enrolled House Bill 2875 (HB 2875-A) Page 2
(b) For a  person who establishes membership in the system on or after January 1, 1996, as de-
scribed in ORS 238.430, 55 years of age  if the employee retires at that age as a police officer or
firefighter or 60 years of age  if the employee retires at that age as other than a police officer or
firefighter.
(18) “Pension”  means annual payments for life derived from contributions by one or more public
employers.
(19) “Police officer” includes:
(a) Employees of institutions defined  in ORS 421.005 as Department of Corrections institutions
whose duties, as assigned by the Director of the Department of  Corrections, include the custody of
persons committed to  the custody of or transferred to the Department of Corrections and employees
of the Department of Corrections who were classified as police officers on or before  July 27, 1989,
whether or not such classification was authorized by law.
(b) Employees of the Department of State  Police who are classified as police officers by the
Superintendent of State Police.
(c) Employees of the Oregon Liquor Control Commission who are classified as  regulatory spe-
cialists by the administrator of the commission.
(d) Sheriffs and those deputy sheriffs or other employees of a sheriff  whose duties, as classified
by the sheriff, are the regular duties of police officers or corrections officers.
(e) Police  chiefs and police personnel of a city who are classified as police officers by the
council or other governing body of the city.
(f) Police officers who are commissioned by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125 and  who
are classified as police officers by the university.
(g) Parole and probation officers employed by the Department  of Corrections, parole and pro-
bation officers who are transferred to county employment under ORS 423.549 and  adult parole and
probation officers, as defined in  ORS 181A.355, who are classified as police officers for the purposes
of this chapter by the county governing body. If a county classifies adult parole  and probation offi-
cers  as  police officers for the purposes of this chapter, and the employees so classified are repres-
ented by a labor organization, any proposal by the county to change that  classification or to cease
to classify adult  parole and probation officers as police officers for the purposes of this chapter is
a mandatory subject of bargaining.
(h) Police officers appointed under ORS 276.021 or 276.023.
(i) Employees of the Port of Portland who are classified as airport police by the Board  of Com-
missioners of the Port of Portland.
(j) Employees of  the State Department of Agriculture who are classified as livestock police of-
ficers by the Director of Agriculture.
(k) Employees of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training who are  classified by
the department as other than secretarial or clerical personnel.
(L) Investigators of the Criminal Justice Division of the Department of Justice.
(m) Corrections officers as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(n) Employees of the Oregon State Lottery Commission who are classified by  the Director of the
Oregon State Lottery as enforcement agents pursuant to ORS 461.110.
(o) The Director of the Department of Corrections.
(p) An employee who for seven consecutive years has been classified as a  police officer as de-
fined by this section, and who  is employed or transferred by the Department of Corrections to fill
a position designated by  the Director of the Department of Corrections as being eligible for police
officer  status.
(q) An employee of the Department of Corrections classified as a police officer on  or prior to
July 27, 1989,  whether or not that classification was authorized by law, as long as the employee
remains in the position  held on July 27, 1989. The initial classification of an employee under a sys-
tem implemented pursuant to ORS 240.190 does not affect police officer status.
Enrolled House Bill 2875 (HB 2875-A) Page 3
(r) Employees of a school district who are appointed and duly  sworn members of a law
enforcement agency of the  district as provided in ORS 332.531 or otherwise employed full-time as
police officers commissioned by the district.
(s) Employees at  youth correction facilities and juvenile detention facilities under ORS 419A.050,
419A.052 and 420.005 to 420.915 who are required  to hold valid Oregon teaching licenses and who
have supervisory, control or teaching responsibilities over juveniles committed to the custody of  the
Department of Corrections or the Oregon Youth Authority.
(t) Employees at youth correction facilities as defined in ORS 420.005  whose primary job de-
scription involves the custody, control, treatment, investigation or  supervision of juveniles placed
in such facilities.
(u) Employees of the Oregon Youth Authority  who are classified as juvenile parole and pro-
bation officers.
(v) Employees of the Department of Human Services who are  prohibited from striking under
ORS 243.726 and whose duties include the  care of residents of residential facilities, as defined in
ORS 443.400, that house individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
(20) “Prior service credit” means credit provided under  ORS 238.442 or under ORS 238.225 (2)
to (6) (1999 Edition).
(21) “Public employer” means the state, one of its agencies, any city, county, or  municipal or
public corporation, any political subdivision of the state  or any instrumentality thereof, or an
agency created by one  or more such governmental organizations to provide governmental services.
For purposes of this chapter, such agency created by one or more  governmental organizations is a
governmental instrumentality and a legal  entity with power to enter into contracts, hold property
and sue and be sued.
(22) “Qualifying  position” means one or more jobs with one or more participating public em-
ployers in which an  employee performs 600 or more hours of service in a calendar year, excluding
any service in a job for which a  participating public employer does not provide benefits under this
chapter pursuant to an application made under ORS 238.035.
(23) “Regular account” means the account established for  each active and inactive member un-
der ORS 238.250.
(24) “Retired member” means a member who is retired for service or disability.
(25) “Retirement credit” means a period of time that  is treated as creditable service for the
purposes of this chapter.
(26)(a) “Salary” means  the remuneration paid an employee in cash out of the funds of a public
employer in return for services to the employer, plus the monetary value, as determined by the
Public Employees Retirement Board, of  whatever living quarters, board, lodging, fuel, laundry and
other advantages the employer furnishes the employee in return for services.
(b) “Salary” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Payments of employee and employer money into a deferred  compensation plan, which are
deemed salary paid in each month of deferral;
(B) The amount  of participation in a tax-sheltered or deferred annuity, which is deemed salary
paid in each month of participation;
(C) Retroactive payments described in ORS 238.008; and
(D) Wages of a  deceased member paid to a surviving spouse or dependent children under ORS
652.190.
(c) “Salary” or “other advantages” does not include:
(A) Travel or any  other expenses incidental to employer’s business which is reimbursed by the
employer;
(B) Payments for insurance coverage by an employer on behalf of employee or employee and
dependents, for which the employee has no cash option;
(C) Payments made on account of an employee’s death;
(D) Any lump sum payment for accumulated unused sick leave;
Enrolled House Bill 2875 (HB 2875-A) Page 4
(E) Any  accelerated payment of an employment contract for a future period or an advance
against future wages;
(F) Any retirement incentive, retirement severance pay, retirement bonus or  retirement
gratuitous payment;
(G) Payments for periods  of leave of absence after the date the employer and employee have
agreed that no future services qualifying pursuant to  ORS 238.015 (3) will be performed, except for
sick leave and vacation;
(H) Payments for instructional services rendered to public universities listed in ORS  352.002 or
the Oregon Health and Science University when such services are in excess of full-time employment
subject to this chapter. A person employed under a  contract for less than 12 months is subject to
this subparagraph only for the months to which the contract pertains;
(I) Payments made by an employer for insurance coverage provided to a domestic  partner of an
employee;
(J) Compensation described and  authorized under ORS 341.556 that is not paid by the community
college employing the faculty member;
(K) Compensation described and authorized under  ORS 352.232 that is not paid by the public
university employing the officer or employee;
(L) Compensation described and authorized  under ORS 353.270 that is not paid by Oregon
Health and Science University; or
(M) For years beginning on or after January  1, 2020, any amount in excess of $195,000 for a
calendar year. If any period over which salary is determined is less than 12 months, the $195,000
limitation for  that period shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number
of months in the determination period and the denominator of which is 12. On January 1 of each
year, the board shall adjust the dollar limit provided by this subparagraph to reflect any percentage
changes in the Consumer Price Index for All  Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as pub-
lished by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(27) “School year” means the period beginning July 1 and ending June 30 next following.
(28) “System” means the Public Employees Retirement System.
(29) “Variable  account” means the account established for a member who participates in the
Variable Annuity Account under ORS 238.260.
(30) “Vested” means being an active member of the system in each of five calendar years.
(31) “Volunteer firefighter” means a firefighter whose position normally requires  less than 600
hours of service per year.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 238A.005 is amended to read:
238A.005. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Active member” means a member of the pension program  or the individual account program
of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan who is actively employed in a qualifying position.
(2) “Actuarial equivalent” means a payment  or series of payments having the same value as the
payment or series of payments replaced, computed on the basis  of interest rate and mortality as-
sumptions adopted by the board.
(3) “Board” means the Public Employees Retirement Board.
(4) “Eligible employee” means a  person who performs services for a participating public em-
ployer, including elected officials other than judges. “Eligible employee” does not include:
(a) Persons engaged as independent contractors;
(b) Aliens working under a training or educational visa;
(c) Persons provided sheltered employment or make-work by a public employer;
(d) Persons categorized by a participating public employer as student employees;
(e) Any person who is in custody in a state institution;
(f) Employees of foreign trade offices  of the Oregon Business Development Department who live
and perform services in foreign countries under the provisions of ORS 285A.075 (1)(g);
(g) An employee actively participating in an alternative retirement program established  under
ORS 353.250 or an optional retirement plan established under ORS 341.551;
Enrolled House Bill 2875 (HB 2875-A) Page 5
(h) Employees of a public university listed in  ORS 352.002 who are actively participating in an
optional retirement plan offered under ORS 243.815;
(i) Persons employed in positions classified as post-doctoral scholar  positions by a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002, or by the Oregon Health and Science University, under ORS 350.370;
(j) Any employee who belongs to a class of employees that was not eligible on August  28, 2003,
for membership in the system under the provisions of ORS chapter 238 or other law;
(k) Any person who belongs to a class of employees who are not  eligible to become members
of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan under the provisions of ORS 238A.070 (2);
(L) Any person who is retired  under ORS 238A.100 to 238A.250 or ORS chapter 238 and who
continues to receive retirement benefits while employed; and
(m) Judges.
(5) “Firefighter” means:
(a) A person employed by a local government, as defined in ORS 174.116, whose  primary job
duties include the fighting of fires;
(b) The State Fire Marshal, the chief deputy state fire marshal and deputy state fire marshals;
(c) An employee of the State Fire Marshal whose primary  duties include fire investi-
gation, fire prevention, fire safety, fire control or fire suppression;
[(c)] (d) An employee  of the State Forestry Department who is certified by the State Forester
as a  professional wildland firefighter and whose primary duties include the abatement of uncon-
trolled fires as described in ORS 477.064; and
[(d)] (e) An employee of the Oregon Military Department whose primary duties  include fighting
structural, aircraft, wildland or other fires.
(6) “Fund” means the Public Employees Retirement Fund.
(7)(a) “Hour of service” means:
(A) An hour for which an eligible employee is directly or indirectly  paid or entitled to payment
by a participating public employer for performance of duties in a qualifying position; and
(B) An hour of vacation, holiday, illness, incapacity, jury duty, military duty or authorized  leave
during which an employee does not  perform duties but for which the employee is directly or indi-
rectly paid or entitled to payment by a participating public employer  for services in a qualifying
position, as long as the hour is within  the number of hours regularly scheduled for the performance
of duties during the period of vacation,  holiday, illness, incapacity, jury duty, military duty or au-
thorized leave.
(b) “Hour of service”  does not include any hour for which payment is made or due under a plan
maintained solely for the purpose of complying with applicable unemployment compensation laws.
(8) “Inactive member” means a member of the pension program  or the individual account pro-
gram of  the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan whose membership has not been terminated, who
is not a retired member and who is not employed in a qualifying position.
(9) “Individual account program” means the defined contribution individual account  program of
the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan established under ORS 238A.025.
(10) “Institution of higher education”  means a public university listed in ORS 352.002, the
Oregon Health and Science University or a community college, as defined in ORS 341.005.
(11) “Member” means an eligible employee who has established membership in the  pension pro-
gram or the individual account program of the Oregon Public Service  Retirement Plan and whose
membership has not been terminated under ORS 238A.110 or 238A.310.
(12) “Participating public employer” means a public employer as defined in ORS 238.005 that
provides retirement benefits for employees of the public employer under the system.
(13) “Pension program” means the defined benefit pension program of the Oregon  Public Service
Retirement Plan established under ORS 238A.025.
(14) “Police officer” means a police officer as described in ORS 238.005.
(15) “Qualifying  position” means one or more jobs with one or more participating public em-
ployers in which  an eligible employee performs 600 or more hours of service in a calendar year,
Enrolled House Bill 2875 (HB 2875-A) Page 6
excluding any service in a job for which benefits are not provided under  the Oregon Public Service
Retirement Plan pursuant to ORS 238A.070 (2).
(16) “Retired member” means a pension program member who is receiving  a pension as provided
in ORS 238A.180 to 238A.195.
(17)(a) “Salary” means the remuneration paid to an active member in return for services to the
participating public employer, including remuneration in the form of living quarters,  board or other
items of value, to the extent the remuneration is  includable in the employee’s taxable income under
Oregon law. “Salary” includes the additional amounts specified  in paragraph (b) of this subsection,
but does not include the amounts specified in paragraph (c) of this  subsection, regardless of whether
those amounts are includable in taxable income.
(b) “Salary” includes the following amounts:
(A) Payments of employee and employer money into a deferred compensation  plan that are made
at the election of the employee.
(B) Contributions to a tax-sheltered or deferred annuity that are made at the election of the
employee.
(C) Any amount that is contributed to a cafeteria  plan or qualified transportation fringe benefit
plan by the employer at the election of the employee  and that is not includable in the taxable in-
come of the employee by reason of 26 U.S.C. 125 or 132(f)(4), as in effect on December 31, 2018.
(D) Any amount that is contributed to a cash or deferred arrangement by the employer  at the
election of the employee and that is not included in the taxable income of  the employee by reason
of 26 U.S.C. 402(e)(3), as in effect on December 31, 2018.
(E) Retroactive payments described in ORS 238.008.
(F) The amount of an employee contribution to the individual account program that is paid by
the employer and deducted from the compensation of the employee, as provided  under ORS 238A.335
(1) and (2)(a).
(G) The amount of an employee contribution to the individual account program that is  not paid
by the employer under ORS 238A.335.
(H) Wages of  a deceased member paid to a surviving spouse or dependent children under ORS
652.190.
(c) “Salary” does not include the following amounts:
(A) Travel or any  other expenses incidental to employer’s business which is reimbursed by the
employer.
(B) Payments made on account of an employee’s death.
(C) Any lump sum payment for accumulated unused sick leave, vacation  leave or other paid
leave.
(D) Any severance payment,  accelerated payment of an employment contract for a future period
or advance against future wages.
(E) Any retirement incentive, retirement bonus or retirement gratuitous payment.
(F) Payment for a leave of absence after the date the  employer and employee have agreed that
no future services in a qualifying position will be performed.
(G) Payments for instructional  services rendered to public universities listed in ORS 352.002 or
the Oregon Health and  Science University when those services are in excess of full-time employment
subject to this chapter. A person employed under a contract  for less than 12 months is subject to
this subparagraph only for the months covered by the contract.
(H) The amount of an employee contribution to the individual account  program that is paid by
the employer and is  not deducted from the compensation of the employee, as provided under ORS
238A.335 (1) and (2)(b).
(I) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 341.556 that  is not paid by the community
college employing the faculty member.
(J) Compensation described and  authorized under ORS 352.232 that is not paid by the public
university employing the officer or employee.
Enrolled House Bill 2875 (HB 2875-A) Page 7
(K) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 353.270 that is not paid by Oregon
Health and Science University.
(L) For years  before 2020, any amount in excess of $200,000 for a calendar year. If any period
over which salary is determined is less than 12 months,  the $200,000 limitation for that period shall
be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of  which is the number of months in the determination
period and the denominator of which is 12. The board shall adopt  rules adjusting this dollar limit
to incorporate cost-of-living adjustments authorized by the Internal Revenue Service.
(M) For years beginning on or after January  1, 2020, any amount in excess of $195,000 for a
calendar year. If any period over which salary is determined is less than 12 months, the $195,000
limitation for  that period shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number
of months in the determination period and the denominator of which is 12. On January 1 of each
year, the board shall adjust the dollar limit provided by this subparagraph to reflect any percentage
changes in the Consumer Price Index for All  Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as pub-
lished by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(18) “System” means the Public Employees Retirement System.
(19) “Workers’ compensation benefits” means:
(a) Payments made under ORS chapter 656; or
(b) Payments provided in lieu of workers’ compensation benefits under ORS 656.027 (6).
SECTION 3.
 ORS 238.374 is amended to read:
238.374. (1) A person applying for payments under this chapter shall give a written statement
to the Public Employees Retirement Board that indicates  whether the payments will be subject to
Oregon personal income tax under ORS 316.127 (9). If the person fails  to provide the statement re-
quired by  this subsection, or the statement indicates that the payments will not be subject to Oregon
personal income tax under ORS 316.127 (9), the board may not pay the person  the increased benefits
provided by chapter 796, Oregon Laws 1991, or chapter 569, Oregon Laws 1995.
(2) If a person is receiving payments under this chapter that  have not been increased under
chapter 796, Oregon Laws 1991, or chapter  569, Oregon Laws 1995, by reason of the provisions of
subsection (1) of this section, and thereafter the payments  become subject to Oregon personal in-
come tax under ORS 316.127 (9), the person shall promptly notify the [ Public Employees Retirement ]
board by written statement that the payments  are subject to Oregon personal income tax under ORS
316.127 (9).
(3) If a person is receiving  payments under this chapter that have not been increased under
chapter 796, Oregon Laws 1991, or chapter 569, Oregon Laws 1995,  by reason of the provisions of
subsection (1) of this section, and  the board receives notice under subsection (2) of this section that
payments to the person under this chapter are subject to Oregon personal income  tax under ORS
316.127 (9), or determines under ORS 238.378 that payments to  the person under this chapter are
subject to Oregon personal income tax under ORS 316.127 (9), the board shall initiate payment  of
the increased benefits provided by chapter 796, Oregon Laws 1991, or chapter 569, Oregon Laws
1995. The increase in benefits becomes effective :
(a) If the  board receives notice under subsection (2) of this section on or after January
1 and on or before April 15 of any calendar year, as soon as  administratively feasible by the
board, but no later than the first day of the second  calendar month following receipt of no-
tice by the board.
(b) If the board receives notice under subsection (2) of  this section after April 15 of any
calendar year, on the first day of the calendar year following receipt of notice by the board.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 238.376 is amended to read:
238.376. (1) If a person is receiving payments under  this chapter, and after the payments com-
mence the payments cease to be subject to Oregon personal  income tax under ORS 316.127 (9), the
person shall promptly notify the Public Employees  Retirement Board by written statement that the
payments are no longer subject to Oregon personal income tax under ORS 316.127  (9). The board
shall reduce any benefits payable to the person by the amount by which the benefits were increased
Enrolled House Bill 2875 (HB 2875-A) Page 8
under chapter 796, Oregon Laws 1991, or chapter 569, Oregon Laws 1995.  The reduction in benefits
becomes  effective :
(a) If the board receives notice under this subsection on or  after January 1 and on or
before April 15 of any calendar year,  as soon as administratively feasible by the board, but
no later than the first day of the second calendar month following  receipt of notice by the
board.
(b) If the board receives  notice under this subsection after April 15 of any calendar year,
on the first day of the calendar year following receipt of notice by the board.
(2) If  a person is receiving payments under this chapter that have been reduced because the
payments are not subject to Oregon personal income  tax under ORS 316.127 (9), and thereafter the
payments become subject to  Oregon personal income tax under ORS 316.127 (9), the person shall
promptly notify the board by  written statement that the payments are once again subject to Oregon
personal income tax under ORS 316.127 (9).
(3) If a person is receiving payments under this chapter that have been reduced because  the
payments are not subject to Oregon personal income tax under ORS 316.127 (9), and  the board re-
ceives notice under subsection (2) of this section that payments to  the person under this chapter are
once again subject to Oregon personal income tax under ORS 316.127 (9), or determines  under ORS
238.378 that payments to the person under this chapter are once again subject to  Oregon personal
income tax under ORS 316.127 (9), the board shall resume payment of the increased benefits provided
by chapter 796, Oregon Laws 1991, or chapter 569,  Oregon Laws 1995. The increase in benefits be-
comes effective :
(a) If the  board receives notice under subsection (2) of this section on or after January
1 and on or before April 15 of any calendar year, as soon as  administratively feasible by the
board, but no later than the first day of the second  calendar month following receipt of no-
tice by the board.
(b) If the board receives notice under subsection (2) of  this section after April 15 of any
calendar year, on the first day of the calendar year following receipt of notice by the board.
SECTION 5.
Section 6 of this 2021 Act is added to and  made a part of ORS chapter 238A.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding ORS 238A.110 and 238A.145  and in consideration of the
COVID-19 pandemic, if calendar year 2020 is a member’s fifth consecutive calendar year of
performing fewer  than 600 hours of service and the member forfeited all retirement credit
under ORS 238A.145 at the end of 2020, but the person performs 600 hours or  more of service
in calendar year  2021, the person’s membership and any retirement credit forfeited at the
end of calendar year 2020 shall be restored.
SECTION 7. (1) The amendments to ORS 238.005 and 238A.005 by sections 1 and 2  of this
2021 Act apply only to a person who:
(a) Is employed by the State Fire Marshal and whose  primary duties include fire inves-
tigation, fire prevention, fire safety,  fire control or fire suppression on the effective date of
this 2021 Act; or
(b) Becomes employed by  the State Fire Marshal as a person whose primary duties in-
clude fire investigation, fire prevention, fire safety, fire control or fire  suppression after the
effective date of this 2021 Act.
(2) Any person who is employed by the State Fire Marshal and whose  primary duties in-
clude fire investigation, fire prevention, fire safety, fire control or fire  suppression on the
effective date of this 2021 Act is entitled to service in the Public  Employees Retirement
System as a firefighter for all service performed as an  employee of the State Fire Marshal
whose primary duties include fire investigation,  fire prevention, fire safety, fire control or
fire suppression, whether performed before, on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2875 (HB 2875-A) Page 9
Passed by House June 16, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2875 (HB 2875-A) Page 10